build/patterns_for_hyphen.txt
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
a1ba
a1be
a1bi
a1bo
a1bu
a1bü
a1ca
a1ce
a1ci
a1co
a1cu
a1cü
a1da
a1de
a1di
a1do
a1du
a1dü
a1fa
a1fe
a1fi
a1fo
a1fu
a1fü
a1ga
a1ge
a1gi
a1go
a1gu
a1gü
a1ha
a1he
a1hi
a1ho
a1hu
a1hü
a1ja
a1je
a1ji
a1jo
a1ju
a1jü
a1ka
a1ke
a1ki
a1ko
a1ku
a1kü
a1la
a1le
a1li
a1lo
a1lu
a1lü
a1ma
a1me
a1mi
a1mo
a1mu
a1mü
a1na
a1ne
a1ni
a1no
a1nu
a1nü
a1ña
a1ñe
a1ñi
a1ño
a1ñu
a1ñü
a1pa
a1pe
a1pi
a1po
a1pu
a1pü
a3que
a3qui
a1qü
a1ra
a1re
a1ri
a1ro
a1ru
a1rü
a1sa
a1se
a1si
a1so
a1su
a1sü
a1ta
a1te
a1ti
a1to
a1tu
a1tü
a1va
a1ve
a1vi
a1vo
a1vu
a1vü
a1wa
a1we
a1wi
a1wo
a1wu
a1wü
a1xa
a1xe
a1xi
a1xo
a1xu
a1xü
a1ya
a1ye
a1yi
a1yo
a1yu
a1yü
a1za
a1ze
a1zi
a1zo
a1zu
a1zü
a1rra
a1rre
a1rri
a1rro
a1rru
a1rrü
a1lla
al1l
a1lle
a1lli
a1llo
a1llu
a1llü
a1cha
a1che
a1chi
a1cho
a1chu
a1chü
e1ba
e1be
e1bi
e1bo
e1bu
e1bü
e1ca
e1ce
e1ci
e1co
e1cu
e1cü
e1da
e1de
e1di
e1do
e1du
e1dü
e1fa
e1fe
e1fi
e1fo
e1fu
e1fü
e1ga
e1ge
e1gi
e1go
e1gu
e1gü
e1ha
e1he
e1hi
e1ho
e1hu
e1hü
e1ja
e1je
e1ji
e1jo
e1ju
e1jü
e1ka
e1ke
e1ki
e1ko
e1ku
e1kü
e1la
e1le
e1li
e1lo
e1lu
e1lü
e1ma
e1me
e1mi
e1mo
e1mu
e1mü
e1na
e1ne
e1ni
e1no
e1nu
e1nü
e1ña
e1ñe
e1ñi
e1ño
e1ñu
e1ñü
e1pa
e1pe
e1pi
e1po
e1pu
e1pü
e3que
e3qui
e1qü
e1ra
e1re
e1ri
e1ro
e1ru
e1rü
e1sa
e1se
e1si
e1so
e1su
e1sü
e1ta
e1te
e1ti
e1to
e1tu
e1tü
e1va
e1ve
e1vi
e1vo
e1vu
e1vü
e1wa
e1we
e1wi
e1wo
e1wu
e1wü
e1xa
e1xe
e1xi
e1xo
e1xu
e1xü
e1ya
e1ye
e1yi
e1yo
e1yu
e1yü
e1za
e1ze
e1zi
e1zo
e1zu
e1zü
e1rra
e1rre
e1rri
e1rro
e1rru
e1rrü
e1lla
el1l
e1lle
e1lli
e1llo
e1llu
e1llü
e1cha
e1che
e1chi
e1cho
e1chu
e1chü
i1ba
i1be
i1bi
i1bo
i1bu
i1bü
i1ca
i1ce
i1ci
i1co
i1cu
i1cü
i1da
i1de
i1di
i1do
i1du
i1dü
i1fa
i1fe
i1fi
i1fo
i1fu
i1fü
i1ga
i1ge
i1gi
i1go
i1gu
i1gü
i1ha
i1he
i1hi
i1ho
i1hu
i1hü
i1ja
i1je
i1ji
i1jo
i1ju
i1jü
i1ka
i1ke
i1ki
i1ko
i1ku
i1kü
i1la
i1le
i1li
i1lo
i1lu
i1lü
i1ma
i1me
i1mi
i1mo
i1mu
i1mü
i1na
i1ne
i1ni
i1no
i1nu
i1nü
i1ña
i1ñe
i1ñi
i1ño
i1ñu
i1ñü
i1pa
i1pe
i1pi
i1po
i1pu
i1pü
i3que
i3qui
i1qü
i1ra
i1re
i1ri
i1ro
i1ru
i1rü
i1sa
i1se
i1si
i1so
i1su
i1sü
i1ta
i1te
i1ti
i1to
i1tu
i1tü
i1va
i1ve
i1vi
i1vo
i1vu
i1vü
i1wa
i1we
i1wi
i1wo
i1wu
i1wü
i1xa
i1xe
i1xi
i1xo
i1xu
i1xü
i1ya
i1ye
i1yi
i1yo
i1yu
i1yü
i1za
i1ze
i1zi
i1zo
i1zu
i1zü
i1rra
i1rre
i1rri
i1rro
i1rru
i1rrü
i1lla
il1l
i1lle
i1lli
i1llo
i1llu
i1llü
i1cha
i1che
i1chi
i1cho
i1chu
i1chü
o1ba
o1be
o1bi
o1bo
o1bu
o1bü
o1ca
o1ce
o1ci
o1co
o1cu
o1cü
o1da
o1de
o1di
o1do
o1du
o1dü
o1fa
o1fe
o1fi
o1fo
o1fu
o1fü
o1ga
o1ge
o1gi
o1go
o1gu
o1gü
o1ha
o1he
o1hi
o1ho
o1hu
o1hü
o1ja
o1je
o1ji
o1jo
o1ju
o1jü
o1ka
o1ke
o1ki
o1ko
o1ku
o1kü
o1la
o1le
o1li
o1lo
o1lu
o1lü
o1ma
o1me
o1mi
o1mo
o1mu
o1mü
o1na
o1ne
o1ni
o1no
o1nu
o1nü
o1ña
o1ñe
o1ñi
o1ño
o1ñu
o1ñü
o1pa
o1pe
o1pi
o1po
o1pu
o1pü
o3que
o3qui
o1qü
o1ra
o1re
o1ri
o1ro
o1ru
o1rü
o1sa
o1se
o1si
o1so
o1su
o1sü
o1ta
o1te
o1ti
o1to
o1tu
o1tü
o1va
o1ve
o1vi
o1vo
o1vu
o1vü
o1wa
o1we
o1wi
o1wo
o1wu
o1wü
o1xa
o1xe
o1xi
o1xo
o1xu
o1xü
o1ya
o1ye
o1yi
o1yo
o1yu
o1yü
o1za
o1ze
o1zi
o1zo
o1zu
o1zü
o1rra
o1rre
o1rri
o1rro
o1rru
o1rrü
o1lla
ol1l
o1lle
o1lli
o1llo
o1llu
o1llü
o1cha
o1che
o1chi
o1cho
o1chu
o1chü
u1ba
u1be
u1bi
u1bo
u1bu
u1bü
u1ca
u1ce
u1ci
u1co
u1cu
u1cü
u1da
u1de
u1di
u1do
u1du
u1dü
u1fa
u1fe
u1fi
u1fo
u1fu
u1fü
u1ga
u1ge
u1gi
u1go
u1gu
u1gü
u1ha
u1he
u1hi
u1ho
u1hu
u1hü
u1ja
u1je
u1ji
u1jo
u1ju
u1jü
u1ka
u1ke
u1ki
u1ko
u1ku
u1kü
u1la
u1le
u1li
u1lo
u1lu
u1lü
u1ma
u1me
u1mi
u1mo
u1mu
u1mü
u1na
u1ne
u1ni
u1no
u1nu
u1nü
u1ña
u1ñe
u1ñi
u1ño
u1ñu
u1ñü
u1pa
u1pe
u1pi
u1po
u1pu
u1pü
u3que
u3qui
u1qü
u1ra
u1re
u1ri
u1ro
u1ru
u1rü
u1sa
u1se
u1si
u1so
u1su
u1sü
u1ta
u1te
u1ti
u1to
u1tu
u1tü
u1va
u1ve
u1vi
u1vo
u1vu
u1vü
u1wa
u1we
u1wi
u1wo
u1wu
u1wü
u1xa
u1xe
u1xi
u1xo
u1xu
u1xü
u1ya
u1ye
u1yi
u1yo
u1yu
u1yü
u1za
u1ze
u1zi
u1zo
u1zu
u1zü
u1rra
u1rre
u1rri
u1rro
u1rru
u1rrü
u1lla
ul1l
u1lle
u1lli
u1llo
u1llu
u1llü
u1cha
u1che
u1chi
u1cho
u1chu
u1chü
ü1ba
ü1be
ü1bi
ü1bo
ü1bu
ü1bü
ü1ca
ü1ce
ü1ci
ü1co
ü1cu
ü1cü
ü1da
ü1de
ü1di
ü1do
ü1du
ü1dü
ü1fa
ü1fe
ü1fi
ü1fo
ü1fu
ü1fü
ü1ga
ü1ge
ü1gi
ü1go
ü1gu
ü1gü
ü1ha
ü1he
ü1hi
ü1ho
ü1hu
ü1hü
ü1ja
ü1je
ü1ji
ü1jo
ü1ju
ü1jü
ü1ka
ü1ke
ü1ki
ü1ko
ü1ku
ü1kü
ü1la
ü1le
ü1li
ü1lo
ü1lu
ü1lü
ü1ma
ü1me
ü1mi
ü1mo
ü1mu
ü1mü
ü1na
ü1ne
ü1ni
ü1no
ü1nu
ü1nü
ü1ña
ü1ñe
ü1ñi
ü1ño
ü1ñu
ü1ñü
ü1pa
ü1pe
ü1pi
ü1po
ü1pu
ü1pü
ü3que
ü3qui
ü1qü
ü1ra
ü1re
ü1ri
ü1ro
ü1ru
ü1rü
ü1sa
ü1se
ü1si
ü1so
ü1su
ü1sü
ü1ta
ü1te
ü1ti
ü1to
ü1tu
ü1tü
ü1va
ü1ve
ü1vi
ü1vo
ü1vu
ü1vü
ü1wa
ü1we
ü1wi
ü1wo
ü1wu
ü1wü
ü1xa
ü1xe
ü1xi
ü1xo
ü1xu
ü1xü
ü1ya
ü1ye
ü1yi
ü1yo
ü1yu
ü1yü
ü1za
ü1ze
ü1zi
ü1zo
ü1zu
ü1zü
ü1rra
ü1rre
ü1rri
ü1rro
ü1rru
ü1rrü
ü1lla
ül1l
ü1lle
ü1lli
ü1llo
ü1llu
ü1llü
ü1cha
ü1che
ü1chi
ü1cho
ü1chu
ü1chü
á1ba
á1be
á1bi
á1bo
á1bu
á1bü
á1ca
á1ce
á1ci
á1co
á1cu
á1cü
á1da
á1de
á1di
á1do
á1du
á1dü
á1fa
á1fe
á1fi
á1fo
á1fu
á1fü
á1ga
á1ge
á1gi
á1go
á1gu
á1gü
á1ha
á1he
á1hi
á1ho
á1hu
á1hü
á1ja
á1je
á1ji
á1jo
á1ju
á1jü
á1ka
á1ke
á1ki
á1ko
á1ku
á1kü
á1la
á1le
á1li
á1lo
á1lu
á1lü
á1ma
á1me
á1mi
á1mo
á1mu
á1mü
á1na
á1ne
á1ni
á1no
á1nu
á1nü
á1ña
á1ñe
á1ñi
á1ño
á1ñu
á1ñü
á1pa
á1pe
á1pi
á1po
á1pu
á1pü
á3que
á3qui
á1qü
á1ra
á1re
á1ri
á1ro
á1ru
á1rü
á1sa
á1se
á1si
á1so
á1su
á1sü
á1ta
á1te
á1ti
á1to
á1tu
á1tü
á1va
á1ve
á1vi
á1vo
á1vu
á1vü
á1wa
á1we
á1wi
á1wo
á1wu
á1wü
á1xa
á1xe
á1xi
á1xo
á1xu
á1xü
á1ya
á1ye
á1yi
á1yo
á1yu
á1yü
á1za
á1ze
á1zi
á1zo
á1zu
á1zü
á1rra
á1rre
á1rri
á1rro
á1rru
á1rrü
á1lla
ál1l
á1lle
á1lli
á1llo
á1llu
á1llü
á1cha
á1che
á1chi
á1cho
á1chu
á1chü
é1ba
é1be
é1bi
é1bo
é1bu
é1bü
é1ca
é1ce
é1ci
é1co
é1cu
é1cü
é1da
é1de
é1di
é1do
é1du
é1dü
é1fa
é1fe
é1fi
é1fo
é1fu
é1fü
é1ga
é1ge
é1gi
é1go
é1gu
é1gü
é1ha
é1he
é1hi
é1ho
é1hu
é1hü
é1ja
é1je
é1ji
é1jo
é1ju
é1jü
é1ka
é1ke
é1ki
é1ko
é1ku
é1kü
é1la
é1le
é1li
é1lo
é1lu
é1lü
é1ma
é1me
é1mi
é1mo
é1mu
é1mü
é1na
é1ne
é1ni
é1no
é1nu
é1nü
é1ña
é1ñe
é1ñi
é1ño
é1ñu
é1ñü
é1pa
é1pe
é1pi
é1po
é1pu
é1pü
é3que
é3qui
é1qü
é1ra
é1re
é1ri
é1ro
é1ru
é1rü
é1sa
é1se
é1si
é1so
é1su
é1sü
é1ta
é1te
é1ti
é1to
é1tu
é1tü
é1va
é1ve
é1vi
é1vo
é1vu
é1vü
é1wa
é1we
é1wi
é1wo
é1wu
é1wü
é1xa
é1xe
é1xi
é1xo
é1xu
é1xü
é1ya
é1ye
é1yi
é1yo
é1yu
é1yü
é1za
é1ze
é1zi
é1zo
é1zu
é1zü
é1rra
é1rre
é1rri
é1rro
é1rru
é1rrü
é1lla
él1l
é1lle
é1lli
é1llo
é1llu
é1llü
é1cha
é1che
é1chi
é1cho
é1chu
é1chü
í1ba
í1be
í1bi
í1bo
í1bu
í1bü
í1ca
í1ce
í1ci
í1co
í1cu
í1cü
í1da
í1de
í1di
í1do
í1du
í1dü
í1fa
í1fe
í1fi
í1fo
í1fu
í1fü
í1ga
í1ge
í1gi
í1go
í1gu
í1gü
í1ha
í1he
í1hi
í1ho
í1hu
í1hü
í1ja
í1je
í1ji
í1jo
í1ju
í1jü
í1ka
í1ke
í1ki
í1ko
í1ku
í1kü
í1la
í1le
í1li
í1lo
í1lu
í1lü
í1ma
í1me
í1mi
í1mo
í1mu
í1mü
í1na
í1ne
í1ni
í1no
í1nu
í1nü
í1ña
í1ñe
í1ñi
í1ño
í1ñu
í1ñü
í1pa
í1pe
í1pi
í1po
í1pu
í1pü
í3que
í3qui
í1qü
í1ra
í1re
í1ri
í1ro
í1ru
í1rü
í1sa
í1se
í1si
í1so
í1su
í1sü
í1ta
í1te
í1ti
í1to
í1tu
í1tü
í1va
í1ve
í1vi
í1vo
í1vu
í1vü
í1wa
í1we
í1wi
í1wo
í1wu
í1wü
í1xa
í1xe
í1xi
í1xo
í1xu
í1xü
í1ya
í1ye
í1yi
í1yo
í1yu
í1yü
í1za
í1ze
í1zi
í1zo
í1zu
í1zü
í1rra
í1rre
í1rri
í1rro
í1rru
í1rrü
í1lla
íl1l
í1lle
í1lli
í1llo
í1llu
í1llü
í1cha
í1che
í1chi
í1cho
í1chu
í1chü
ó1ba
ó1be
ó1bi
ó1bo
ó1bu
ó1bü
ó1ca
ó1ce
ó1ci
ó1co
ó1cu
ó1cü
ó1da
ó1de
ó1di
ó1do
ó1du
ó1dü
ó1fa
ó1fe
ó1fi
ó1fo
ó1fu
ó1fü
ó1ga
ó1ge
ó1gi
ó1go
ó1gu
ó1gü
ó1ha
ó1he
ó1hi
ó1ho
ó1hu
ó1hü
ó1ja
ó1je
ó1ji
ó1jo
ó1ju
ó1jü
ó1ka
ó1ke
ó1ki
ó1ko
ó1ku
ó1kü
ó1la
ó1le
ó1li
ó1lo
ó1lu
ó1lü
ó1ma
ó1me
ó1mi
ó1mo
ó1mu
ó1mü
ó1na
ó1ne
ó1ni
ó1no
ó1nu
ó1nü
ó1ña
ó1ñe
ó1ñi
ó1ño
ó1ñu
ó1ñü
ó1pa
ó1pe
ó1pi
ó1po
ó1pu
ó1pü
ó3que
ó3qui
ó1qü
ó1ra
ó1re
ó1ri
ó1ro
ó1ru
ó1rü
ó1sa
ó1se
ó1si
ó1so
ó1su
ó1sü
ó1ta
ó1te
ó1ti
ó1to
ó1tu
ó1tü
ó1va
ó1ve
ó1vi
ó1vo
ó1vu
ó1vü
ó1wa
ó1we
ó1wi
ó1wo
ó1wu
ó1wü
ó1xa
ó1xe
ó1xi
ó1xo
ó1xu
ó1xü
ó1ya
ó1ye
ó1yi
ó1yo
ó1yu
ó1yü
ó1za
ó1ze
ó1zi
ó1zo
ó1zu
ó1zü
ó1rra
ó1rre
ó1rri
ó1rro
ó1rru
ó1rrü
ó1lla
ól1l
ó1lle
ó1lli
ó1llo
ó1llu
ó1llü
ó1cha
ó1che
ó1chi
ó1cho
ó1chu
ó1chü
ú1ba
ú1be
ú1bi
ú1bo
ú1bu
ú1bü
ú1ca
ú1ce
ú1ci
ú1co
ú1cu
ú1cü
ú1da
ú1de
ú1di
ú1do
ú1du
ú1dü
ú1fa
ú1fe
ú1fi
ú1fo
ú1fu
ú1fü
ú1ga
ú1ge
ú1gi
ú1go
ú1gu
ú1gü
ú1ha
ú1he
ú1hi
ú1ho
ú1hu
ú1hü
ú1ja
ú1je
ú1ji
ú1jo
ú1ju
ú1jü
ú1ka
ú1ke
ú1ki
ú1ko
ú1ku
ú1kü
ú1la
ú1le
ú1li
ú1lo
ú1lu
ú1lü
ú1ma
ú1me
ú1mi
ú1mo
ú1mu
ú1mü
ú1na
ú1ne
ú1ni
ú1no
ú1nu
ú1nü
ú1ña
ú1ñe
ú1ñi
ú1ño
ú1ñu
ú1ñü
ú1pa
ú1pe
ú1pi
ú1po
ú1pu
ú1pü
ú3que
ú3qui
ú1qü
ú1ra
ú1re
ú1ri
ú1ro
ú1ru
ú1rü
ú1sa
ú1se
ú1si
ú1so
ú1su
ú1sü
ú1ta
ú1te
ú1ti
ú1to
ú1tu
ú1tü
ú1va
ú1ve
ú1vi
ú1vo
ú1vu
ú1vü
ú1wa
ú1we
ú1wi
ú1wo
ú1wu
ú1wü
ú1xa
ú1xe
ú1xi
ú1xo
ú1xu
ú1xü
ú1ya
ú1ye
ú1yi
ú1yo
ú1yu
ú1yü
ú1za
ú1ze
ú1zi
ú1zo
ú1zu
ú1zü
ú1rra
ú1rre
ú1rri
ú1rro
ú1rru
ú1rrü
ú1lla
úl1l
ú1lle
ú1lli
ú1llo
ú1llu
ú1llü
ú1cha
ú1che
ú1chi
ú1cho
ú1chu
ú1chü
a1bá
a1bé
a1bí
a1bó
a1bú
a1cá
a1cé
a1cí
a1có
a1cú
a1dá
a1dé
a1dí
a1dó
a1dú
a1fá
a1fé
a1fí
a1fó
a1fú
a1gá
a1gé
a1gí
a1gó
a1gú
a1há
a1hé
a1hí
a1hó
a1hú
a1já
a1jé
a1jí
a1jó
a1jú
a1ká
a1ké
a1kí
a1kó
a1kú
a1lá
a1lé
a1lí
a1ló
a1lú
a1má
a1mé
a1mí
a1mó
a1mú
a1ná
a1né
a1ní
a1nó
a1nú
a1ñá
a1ñé
a1ñí
a1ñó
a1ñú
a1pá
a1pé
a1pí
a1pó
a1pú
a3qué
a3quí
a1rá
a1ré
a1rí
a1ró
a1rú
a1sá
a1sé
a1sí
a1só
a1sú
a1tá
a1té
a1tí
a1tó
a1tú
a1vá
a1vé
a1ví
a1vó
a1vú
a1wá
a1wé
a1wí
a1wó
a1wú
a1xá
a1xé
a1xí
a1xó
a1xú
a1yá
a1yé
a1yí
a1yó
a1yú
a1zá
a1zé
a1zí
a1zó
a1zú
a1rrá
a1rré
a1rrí
a1rró
a1rrú
a1llá
a1llé
a1llí
a1lló
a1llú
a1chá
a1ché
a1chí
a1chó
a1chú
e1bá
e1bé
e1bí
e1bó
e1bú
e1cá
e1cé
e1cí
e1có
e1cú
e1dá
e1dé
e1dí
e1dó
e1dú
e1fá
e1fé
e1fí
e1fó
e1fú
e1gá
e1gé
e1gí
e1gó
e1gú
e1há
e1hé
e1hí
e1hó
e1hú
e1já
e1jé
e1jí
e1jó
e1jú
e1ká
e1ké
e1kí
e1kó
e1kú
e1lá
e1lé
e1lí
e1ló
e1lú
e1má
e1mé
e1mí
e1mó
e1mú
e1ná
e1né
e1ní
e1nó
e1nú
e1ñá
e1ñé
e1ñí
e1ñó
e1ñú
e1pá
e1pé
e1pí
e1pó
e1pú
e3qué
e3quí
e1rá
e1ré
e1rí
e1ró
e1rú
e1sá
e1sé
e1sí
e1só
e1sú
e1tá
e1té
e1tí
e1tó
e1tú
e1vá
e1vé
e1ví
e1vó
e1vú
e1wá
e1wé
e1wí
e1wó
e1wú
e1xá
e1xé
e1xí
e1xó
e1xú
e1yá
e1yé
e1yí
e1yó
e1yú
e1zá
e1zé
e1zí
e1zó
e1zú
e1rrá
e1rré
e1rrí
e1rró
e1rrú
e1llá
e1llé
e1llí
e1lló
e1llú
e1chá
e1ché
e1chí
e1chó
e1chú
i1bá
i1bé
i1bí
i1bó
i1bú
i1cá
i1cé
i1cí
i1có
i1cú
i1dá
i1dé
i1dí
i1dó
i1dú
i1fá
i1fé
i1fí
i1fó
i1fú
i1gá
i1gé
i1gí
i1gó
i1gú
i1há
i1hé
i1hí
i1hó
i1hú
i1já
i1jé
i1jí
i1jó
i1jú
i1ká
i1ké
i1kí
i1kó
i1kú
i1lá
i1lé
i1lí
i1ló
i1lú
i1má
i1mé
i1mí
i1mó
i1mú
i1ná
i1né
i1ní
i1nó
i1nú
i1ñá
i1ñé
i1ñí
i1ñó
i1ñú
i1pá
i1pé
i1pí
i1pó
i1pú
i3qué
i3quí
i1rá
i1ré
i1rí
i1ró
i1rú
i1sá
i1sé
i1sí
i1só
i1sú
i1tá
i1té
i1tí
i1tó
i1tú
i1vá
i1vé
i1ví
i1vó
i1vú
i1wá
i1wé
i1wí
i1wó
i1wú
i1xá
i1xé
i1xí
i1xó
i1xú
i1yá
i1yé
i1yí
i1yó
i1yú
i1zá
i1zé
i1zí
i1zó
i1zú
i1rrá
i1rré
i1rrí
i1rró
i1rrú
i1llá
i1llé
i1llí
i1lló
i1llú
i1chá
i1ché
i1chí
i1chó
i1chú
o1bá
o1bé
o1bí
o1bó
o1bú
o1cá
o1cé
o1cí
o1có
o1cú
o1dá
o1dé
o1dí
o1dó
o1dú
o1fá
o1fé
o1fí
o1fó
o1fú
o1gá
o1gé
o1gí
o1gó
o1gú
o1há
o1hé
o1hí
o1hó
o1hú
o1já
o1jé
o1jí
o1jó
o1jú
o1ká
o1ké
o1kí
o1kó
o1kú
o1lá
o1lé
o1lí
o1ló
o1lú
o1má
o1mé
o1mí
o1mó
o1mú
o1ná
o1né
o1ní
o1nó
o1nú
o1ñá
o1ñé
o1ñí
o1ñó
o1ñú
o1pá
o1pé
o1pí
o1pó
o1pú
o3qué
o3quí
o1rá
o1ré
o1rí
o1ró
o1rú
o1sá
o1sé
o1sí
o1só
o1sú
o1tá
o1té
o1tí
o1tó
o1tú
o1vá
o1vé
o1ví
o1vó
o1vú
o1wá
o1wé
o1wí
o1wó
o1wú
o1xá
o1xé
o1xí
o1xó
o1xú
o1yá
o1yé
o1yí
o1yó
o1yú
o1zá
o1zé
o1zí
o1zó
o1zú
o1rrá
o1rré
o1rrí
o1rró
o1rrú
o1llá
o1llé
o1llí
o1lló
o1llú
o1chá
o1ché
o1chí
o1chó
o1chú
u1bá
u1bé
u1bí
u1bó
u1bú
u1cá
u1cé
u1cí
u1có
u1cú
u1dá
u1dé
u1dí
u1dó
u1dú
u1fá
u1fé
u1fí
u1fó
u1fú
u1gá
u1gé
u1gí
u1gó
u1gú
u1há
u1hé
u1hí
u1hó
u1hú
u1já
u1jé
u1jí
u1jó
u1jú
u1ká
u1ké
u1kí
u1kó
u1kú
u1lá
u1lé
u1lí
u1ló
u1lú
u1má
u1mé
u1mí
u1mó
u1mú
u1ná
u1né
u1ní
u1nó
u1nú
u1ñá
u1ñé
u1ñí
u1ñó
u1ñú
u1pá
u1pé
u1pí
u1pó
u1pú
u3qué
u3quí
u1rá
u1ré
u1rí
u1ró
u1rú
u1sá
u1sé
u1sí
u1só
u1sú
u1tá
u1té
u1tí
u1tó
u1tú
u1vá
u1vé
u1ví
u1vó
u1vú
u1wá
u1wé
u1wí
u1wó
u1wú
u1xá
u1xé
u1xí
u1xó
u1xú
u1yá
u1yé
u1yí
u1yó
u1yú
u1zá
u1zé
u1zí
u1zó
u1zú
u1rrá
u1rré
u1rrí
u1rró
u1rrú
u1llá
u1llé
u1llí
u1lló
u1llú
u1chá
u1ché
u1chí
u1chó
u1chú
ü1bá
ü1bé
ü1bí
ü1bó
ü1bú
ü1cá
ü1cé
ü1cí
ü1có
ü1cú
ü1dá
ü1dé
ü1dí
ü1dó
ü1dú
ü1fá
ü1fé
ü1fí
ü1fó
ü1fú
ü1gá
ü1gé
ü1gí
ü1gó
ü1gú
ü1há
ü1hé
ü1hí
ü1hó
ü1hú
ü1já
ü1jé
ü1jí
ü1jó
ü1jú
ü1ká
ü1ké
ü1kí
ü1kó
ü1kú
ü1lá
ü1lé
ü1lí
ü1ló
ü1lú
ü1má
ü1mé
ü1mí
ü1mó
ü1mú
ü1ná
ü1né
ü1ní
ü1nó
ü1nú
ü1ñá
ü1ñé
ü1ñí
ü1ñó
ü1ñú
ü1pá
ü1pé
ü1pí
ü1pó
ü1pú
ü3qué
ü3quí
ü1rá
ü1ré
ü1rí
ü1ró
ü1rú
ü1sá
ü1sé
ü1sí
ü1só
ü1sú
ü1tá
ü1té
ü1tí
ü1tó
ü1tú
ü1vá
ü1vé
ü1ví
ü1vó
ü1vú
ü1wá
ü1wé
ü1wí
ü1wó
ü1wú
